Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-823
Domestic health and accident associations; reserves; creation.

Nothing in sections 44-821 to 44-825, or in any law enacted before August 24, 1941, shall be construed to place any limitation upon the right of any assessment association to create reserves for expenses, unearned premiums or claims, or to create a surplus or contingency fund in such amount as may in the opinion of its board of directors be deemed prudent for the future protection of its policyholders.

Laws 1941, c. 89, § 3, p. 342;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-809;

R.S.1943, § 44-823.